en: Bassoon model level: Intermediate; Professional; Student/Beginner; Other
ru: Уровень модели фагота: Средний уровень; Профессиональный; Ученический / для начинающих; Другое
fi: Fagotin soittajataso: Keskitaso; Ammattilaistaso; Oppilas/Aloittelija; Muu
da: Modelniveau for fagot: Mellemniveau; Professionel; Elev/begynder; Andet
zh-TW: 低音管型號等級: 中階; 專業; 學生/初學者; 其他
fr: Niveau du modèle de basson: Intermédiaire; Professionnel; Étudiant/Débutant; Autre
sk-SK: Úroveň modelu fagotu: Stredne pokročilí; Profesionáli; Študenti/začiatočníci; Iné
de: Spielniveau des Fagottmodells: Fortgeschritten; Profi; Schüler/Anfänger; Sonstige
ko: 바순 모델 등급: 중급자용; 전문가용; 학생/초보자용; 기타
lt-LT: Fagoto modelio lygis: Vidutinio lygio; Profesionalus; Mokyklinis / pradedantiesiems; Kita
vi: Cấp độ người chơi kèn bassoon: Trung cấp; Chuyên nghiệp; Học viên/Người mới bắt đầu; Khác
hu: Fagott modell szintje: Középhaladó; Professzionális; Tanuló/Kezdő; Egyéb
es: Nivel de modelo de fagot: Intermedio; Profesional; Estudiante/principiante; Otro
nl: Fagot modelniveau: Gevorderd; Professioneel; Student/beginner; Overig
th: ระดับรุ่นของบาสซูน: ระดับกลาง; ระดับมืออาชีพ; ระดับนักเรียน/ผู้เริ่มต้น; อื่นๆ
nb: Fagottmodellnivå: Viderekommen; Profesjonell; Student/nybegynner; Annet
cs: Úroveň modelu fagotu: Pro pokročilé; Profesionální; Pro studenty / začátečníky; Jiné
pl: Poziom modelu fagotu: Średniozaawansowany; Profesjonalny; Uczniowski/dla początkujących; Inny
zh-CN: 巴松管型号等级: 中级; 专业级; 学生/初学者; 其他
ja: ファゴットモデルレベル: 中級; プロフェッショナル; スチューデント/初心者向け; その他
ro-RO: Nivelul modelului de fagot: Intermediar; Profesional; Student/începător; Altele
pt-PT: Nível do modelo de fagote: Intermédio; Profissional; Estudante/iniciante; Outro
pt-BR: Nível do modelo de fagote: Intermediário; Profissional; Estudante/iniciante; Outros
tr: Fagot seviye sınıfı: Orta seviye; Profesyonel; Öğrenci/Başlangıç; Diğer
sv: Fagottmodellnivå: Medelavancerad; Professionell; Elev/nybörjare; Övrigt
sl-SI: Raven modela fagota: Srednja stopnja; Profesionalno; Za študente/začetnike; Drugo
bg-BG: Ниво на модела на фагот: Средно ниво; Професионално; За ученици/начинаещи; Друго
it: Livello del modello di fagotto: Intermedio; Professionale; Studente/Principiante; Altro
el: Επίπεδο μοντέλου φαγκότου: Μεσαίου επιπέδου; Επαγγελματικό; Σπουδαστικό / αρχαρίων; Άλλο
hr-HR: Razina za model fagota: Srednja razina; Profesionalna razina; Za učenike/početnike; Ostalo